Utah statutes.
31A-5-102.   Scope and purposes.
(1) (a)  Except as expressly provided otherwise in this title, this chapter
applies to all corporations organized under Utah law and doing an insurance
business as defined under Section 31A-1-301, except those expressly governed
by other chapters of this title.  This chapter applies to corporations doing a
reinsurance business, whether or not they do other insurance business.
(b)  Except as expressly provided otherwise, this chapter does not apply to
nondomestic insurers.
(c)  Except as provided otherwise in this title, Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah
Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, and Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised
Business Corporation Act, apply to corporations under this chapter.
(d)  If Title 16, Chapter 6a, or Title 16, Chapter 10a, conflict with this
title, this title governs.
(2)  The purposes of this chapter include:
(a)  to provide a procedure for the formation of insurance corporations;
(b)  to assure the solidity of insurance corporations by providing an
organizational framework to facilitate sound management, sound operation, and
sound regulation;
(c)  to provide fair means of corporate transformation; and
(d)  where feasible, to strengthen internal corporate democracy through
enhancing shareholder and policyholder participation.
